Utah statutes.
48-2c-604.   Waiver of protection of limited liability.

(1)  A member of a company may waive the protection against personal liability of Section 48-2c-601 for any debt, obligation, or liability of a company by signing a waiver in the articles of organization or certificate of amendment to the articles of organization.

(2)  The extent or scope of the waiver is determined by the signed waiver in the articles of organization or certificate of amendment.

